New York, session 2025-2026, S4998.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (a) of section 521 of the judiciary law, as 2 amended by chapter 302 of the laws of 2002, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) of this section, trial and 5 grand jurors in each court of the unified court system shall be entitled 6 to an allowance equal to the sum of [forty] seventy-two dollars per day 7 for each and every day of physical attendance wherein the court 8 convenes, except that no person who is employed shall be entitled to 9 receive such allowance if, pursuant to section five hundred nineteen of 10 this article, [his or her] their employer is prohibited from withholding 11 the first [forty] seventy-two dollars of wages of such person during 12 such period and such person's daily wages equal or exceed [forty] seven- 13 ty-two dollars. If such person's daily wages are less than [forty] 14 seventy-two dollars, [he or she] such person shall be entitled to 15 receive an allowance hereunder equal to the difference between [forty] 16 seventy-two dollars and the amount of [his or her] their daily wages. 17 Such fees and those expenses actually and necessarily incurred in 18 providing food and lodging for jurors shall be a state charge payable 19 out of funds appropriated to the office of court administration for that 20 purpose. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07267-03-5 S. 4998--A 2 1 § 2. Section 519 of the judiciary law, as added by chapter 85 of the 2 laws of 1995, is amended to read as follows: 3 § 519. Right of juror to be absent from employment. Any person who is 4 summoned to serve as a juror under the provisions of this article and 5 who notifies [his or her] their employer to that effect prior to the 6 commencement of a term of service shall not, on account of absence from 7 employment by reason of such jury service, be subject to discharge or 8 penalty. An employer may, however, withhold wages of any such employee 9 serving as a juror during the period of such service; provided that an 10 employer who employs more than ten employees shall not withhold the 11 first [forty] seventy-two dollars of such juror's daily wages during the 12 first three days of jury service. Withholding of wages in accordance 13 with this section shall not be deemed a penalty. Violation of this 14 section shall constitute a criminal contempt of court punishable pursu- 15 ant to section seven hundred fifty of this chapter. 16 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 17 have become a law.